Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3116
Act, how cited.

Sections
30-3116 to 30-3149 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Principal
and Income Act.

Laws 2001, LB 56, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 33;

Laws 2009, LB80, § 1.